Illinois, session 104th, SB3565.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 9-15 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/9-15)7    Sec. 9-15. Township food pantries. In addition to 8financial aid provided to persons eligible therefor under 9Article VI of this Code, in a county under township 10organization, a township may provide, from moneys received and 11collected for public aid to all persons eligible therefor 12under Article VI of this Code, funds, may establish and 13administer food banks, food pantries, and programs for 14providing in-kind aid in meeting basic maintenance 15requirements, including, but not limited to, food, paper 16goods, toiletries, and clothing, to persons who are poor, 17indigent, homeless, or in need of immediate assistance 18regardless of their eligibility , in addition to financial aid 19provided under this Code.20(Source: P.A. 101-309, eff. 1-1-20.)